Tennessee, session 114, SB2606.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 43, Chapter 1, Part 1, is amended by
adding the following as a new section:
The department of agriculture shall use funds within the department's Tennessee
agricultural enhancement fund to directly purchase and distribute round hay baling
machines to applicants in the hay equipment portion of the Tennessee agricultural
enhancement program. The requirements for the purchase and distribution of machines
are as follows:
(1) Prior to October 1, 2026, the department shall purchase one hundred
(100) round hay baling machines;
(2) On or after October 1, 2026, an applicant may apply to receive one
(1) machine from the department in lieu of purchasing a machine and applying
for a cost-share grant associated with that purchase;
(3) Except for the reimbursement and cost-share requirements, an
applicant must meet all other eligibility and program requirements to be eligible to
receive a machine; and
(4) An applicant that receives a machine is ineligible for a cost-share
grant in the hay equipment portion of the agricultural enhancement program for a
period of time, to be determined by dividing the cost of the machine by the
amount of twelve thousand dollars ($12,000).
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
SB2606
007886
- 1 -